Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
CHAPTER 118A Election of Judges

118A.010.
Definitions — Applicability of provisions of KRS Chapter 118.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Ballot” or “official ballot” means the official presentation of offices and candidates to be voted for, including write-in candidates, and all public questions submitted for determination, and shall include a voting machine ballot, a paper ballot, an absentee ballot, a special ballot, or a supplemental paper ballot which has been authorized for the use of the voters in any primary, regular election, or special election by the Secretary of State or the county clerk;

“Election” refers only to elections for offices of the Court of Justice;

“Voting equipment” means any physical component of a voting system and includes voting machines where voting machines are in operation;

“Voting machine” or “machine” means a part of a voting system that consists of:

A direct recording electronic voting machine that:

Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or electro-operated components that may be actuated by the voter;

Processes the data by means of a computer program;

Records voting data and ballot images in internal and external memory components; and

Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory component and on a printed copy; or

One (1) or more electronic devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot marking device and an electronic or automatic vote tabulating device; and

“Voting system” means:

The total combination of physical, mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment, including the software, hardware, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support that equipment, that is used to:

Define ballots;

Cast and count votes;

Report or display election results; and

Maintain and produce any audit trail information; and

The practices and associated documentation used to:

Identify system components and versions of those components;

Test the system during its development and maintenance;

Maintain records of system errors and defects;

Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial qualification of the system; and

Make available any materials to the voter, such as notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots.

No provisions of KRS Chapter 118 existing on March 10, 1976, except KRS

118.015

through

118.045

shall apply to such elections. All other provisions of the election laws not inconsistent with this chapter shall be applicable thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 1, effective March 10, 1976; 1982, ch. 360, § 42, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 66, § 17, effective June 24, 2003; 2021 ch. 197, § 57, effective June 29, 2021.

118A.020.
Justices
of the Supreme Court.

Justices of the Supreme Court
shall be elected from the Supreme Court districts established by KRS Chapter
21A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 2, effective March 10, 1976.

118A.030.
Judges
of the Court of Appeals.

Judges of the Court of Appeals shall be elected from the same districts as are justices of the Supreme Court.

In each Court of Appeals district there shall be, for election purposes, numbered divisions corresponding to the number of Court of Appeals Judges in the district. Each judge shall be elected at large from the entire district.

Each numbered division of a district shall be voted upon and shall be tallied separately.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 3, effective March 10, 1976.

118A.040.
Circuit
Judges.

Circuit Judges shall be elected from the judicial circuits established in KRS Chapter 23A.

In judicial circuits having two (2) or more judges there shall be, for election purposes, numbered divisions corresponding to the number of Circuit Judges in the circuit. Each judge shall be elected at large from the entire circuit.

Each numbered division of a circuit shall be voted upon and shall be tallied separately.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 4, effective March 10, 1976; 1980, ch. 188, § 101, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Election, Const., § 117.

118A.045.
Election
of family court judges.

Family court judges shall be elected from the judicial circuits established in KRS Chapter 23A and to a family court division so designated by the Supreme Court pursuant to Section 112(6) of the Constitution of Kentucky.

All family court divisions as certified by the Clerk of the Supreme Court of Kentucky shall have such designation specifically appear on the ballot. The words “Family Court” shall be printed on the ballot in an appropriate location for divisions of Circuit Court certified by the Clerk of the Supreme Court of Kentucky as family court divisions. Prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of each scheduled election year, the Clerk of the Supreme Court of Kentucky shall certify the divisions of Circuit Court within a judicial circuit that are designated as family court divisions and deliver such certification to the Secretary of State.

Except as provided in KRS

23A.070

, in judicial circuits having two (2) or more judges there shall be, for election purposes, numbered divisions corresponding to the number of Circuit Judges in the circuit. Each judge shall be elected at large from the entire circuit.

Each numbered division of a circuit shall be voted upon and shall be tallied separately.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 66, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 124, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

118A.050.
District
Judges.

District Judges shall be elected from judicial districts.

In judicial districts having two (2) or more judges there shall be, for election purposes, numbered divisions corresponding to the number of District Judges in the district. Each judge shall be elected at large from the entire district.

Each numbered division of a district shall be voted upon and shall be tallied separately.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 5, effective March 10, 1976.

118A.060.
Petition for nomination — Examination of petition — Form and order of names on ballot — Secretary of State’s duties — Ballot position unalterable — Certification of nomination.

Except as provided in KRS

118A.100

, no person’s name shall appear on a ballot, including an absentee ballot, for an office of the Court of Justice without first having been nominated as provided in this section.

Each candidate for nomination shall file a petition for nomination with the Secretary of State not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot and not later than the first Friday following the first Monday in January preceding the day fixed by law for holding the primary for the office. The petition shall be sworn to before an officer authorized to administer an oath by the candidate and by not less than two (2) registered voters from the district or circuit from which he or she seeks nomination. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. The petition shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which the papers are permitted to be filed.

The petition for nomination shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The petition shall include a declaration sworn to by the candidate, that he or she possesses all the constitutional and statutory requirements of the office for which the candidate has filed. Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the petition and shall not be printed on the ballots as part of the candidate’s name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be acceptable as the candidate’s name.

The Secretary of State shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing. The order of names on the ballot for each district or circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the filing deadline for the primary as established in this section and in KRS

83A.045

and

118.165

.

Not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215(1)(a) preceding the primary, and after the order of names on the ballot has been determined as required in subsection (4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:

Certify to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in the election of the various candidates, the name and place of residence of each candidate for each office, by district or circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, as specified in the petitions for nomination filed with him or her; and

Designate for the county clerks the office of the Court of Justice with which the names of candidates shall be printed and the order in which they are to appear on the ballot.

The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the Secretary of State.

The county clerks of each county shall cause to be printed on the ballots for the primary the names of the candidates for offices in the Court of Justice.

The names of the candidates shall be placed on the ballots in a separate column or columns or in a separate line or lines and identified by the words “Judicial Ballot.” The words “Vote for one,” or “Vote for one in each division,” shall be printed on the ballot in an appropriate location. The office, numbered division if divisions exist, and the candidates shall be clearly labeled. No party designation or emblem of any kind, nor any sign indicating any candidate’s political belief or party affiliation, shall be used on the ballots.

The two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes for nomination for justice or judge of a district or circuit, or numbered division if divisions exist, shall be nominated. Certificates of nomination shall be issued as provided in KRS

118A.190

.

If it appears after expiration of the time for filing petitions for nomination that there are not more than two (2) candidates who have filed the necessary petitions for a place on the ballot in the regular election, no drawing for ballot position shall be held and the Secretary of State shall immediately issue and file in the Secretary’s office certificates of nomination, and send copies to the candidates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 6, effective March 10, 1976; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 11; 1982, ch. 394, § 33, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 25, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 37, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 238, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 48, § 60, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 2, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 275, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2008, ch. 79, § 15, effective July 15, 2008; 2019 ch. 187, § 3, effective November 6, 2019; 2021 ch. 197, § 58, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2008). The Reviser of Statutes has corrected a manifest clerical or typographical error in the way this statute was amended in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 79, sec. 15. In that Act, subsection (3) of this statute was inadvertently deleted and subsection (2) of this statute was inadvertently repeated, then amended. This change has been made under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

(1/13/93). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1)(e),
the prior reference to KRS

118A.110

which appeared in subsection (1) of this
statute has been deleted because of the repeal of KRS

118A.110

by 1992 Ky. Acts ch. 454, sec. 2, effective July 14, 1992.

118A.070.
Eligibility
of voters. [Repealed.]

118A.080.
Denial of right to have name placed on ballot — Restoration — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

No person who was a candidate for nomination for any office of the Court of Justice in a primary and who, before the succeeding regular election, is declared by the final judgment of any court of competent jurisdiction to have violated, in the primary, any provision of KRS Chapter 121, or to be responsible for such violation by others, shall have his or her name placed on the ballot for any office to be voted for in the succeeding regular election. However, if such judgment is subsequently reversed prior to the time of printing of the ballots, the candidate’s name shall be restored on the ballot.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 8, effective March 10, 1976; 2013, ch. 66, § 9, effective June 25, 2013.

118A.090.
Determination of order of names on ballot for regular election — Secretary of State’s duties — Ballot labels — Ballot position unalterable — District, circuit, or numbered division candidate with most votes elected.

For the regular election, the order of names on the ballot for each district or circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the regular election, except as provided in KRS 118A.100(6).

Not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215(1)(b) after the filing deadline for the regular election in a year in which there is no election for President and Vice President of the United States, or not later than the date set forth in KRS 118.215(1)(c) preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice President of the United States, and after the order of names on the ballot has been determined as required in subsection (1) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:

Certify to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in the election of the various candidates, the name and place of residence of each candidate for each office, by district or circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, as certified under KRS

118A.060

; and

Designate for the county clerks the office of the Court of Justice with which the names of candidates shall be printed and the order in which they are to appear on the ballot.

The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the Secretary of State. The county clerks of each county shall cause to be printed on the ballots for the regular elections the names of the candidates for offices of the Court of Justice.

The names of the candidates shall be placed on the ballots in a separate column or columns or in a separate line or lines and identified by the words “Judicial Ballot,” and in such a manner that the casting of a vote for all of the candidates of a political party will not operate to cast a vote for judicial candidates. The words “Vote for one” or “Vote for one in each division,” shall be printed on the ballot in an appropriate location. The office, numbered division thereof if divisions exist, and the candidates therefor shall be clearly labeled. No party designation or emblem of any kind, nor any sign indicating any candidate’s political belief or party affiliation, shall be used on any ballot.

The candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast at the regular election for a district or circuit, or for a numbered division thereof if divisions exist, shall be elected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 9, effective March 10, 1976; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 12; 1984, ch. 185, § 26, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 470, § 38, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 61, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 19, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 19, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 2, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 79, § 16, effective July 15, 2008; 2018 ch. 162, § 5, effective November 7, 2018; 2021 ch. 197, § 59, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(2/12/2018). In subsection (2) of this statute, a reference to “KRS

118.215

(1)(c)” has been changed to read “KRS

118.215

(1)(b),” and a reference to “KRS 118.215(1)(d)” has been changed to read “KRS 118.215(1)(c).” When KRS 118.215 was amended in 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 129, sec. 8, the paragraphs in subsection (1) of that statute were renumbered, but this statute was not included in that Act to also conform the citations to the paragraphs of KRS 118.215(1) in this statute. The Reviser of Statutes has made the conforming change under the authority of KRS 7.135.

118A.100.
Filling vacancy for unexpired term — Filling nomination when nominees unavailable — Ineligibility of Senior Status Special Judge.

Candidates for an unexpired term of a judicial office to be filled at a regular election shall be nominated at the primary next preceding the regular election in the manner prescribed in KRS

118A.060

if the vacancy occurs not later than the second Friday in December preceding the primary. If the vacancy occurs on or after that date, the election to fill the unexpired term shall be held in accordance with the procedures described in this section and Section 152 of the Constitution of Kentucky.

If in a regular election for judicial office no candidates nominated as provided in KRS

118A.060

are available due to death, incapacity, or withdrawal, and the candidates have not been replaced as provided in KRS

118A.060

, the election to fill the regular term shall be conducted in the manner prescribed in subsections (3) through (11) of this section.

Each candidate shall file a petition for nomination with the Secretary of State not earlier than the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the election for the unexpired term will be held and not later than the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the day fixed by law for holding the regular election for the unexpired term, if the vacancy occurs prior to the first Tuesday following the first Monday in June. If the vacancy occurs after the first Tuesday following the first Monday in June, each candidate shall file a petition for nomination with the Secretary of State not later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the day fixed by law for holding the regular election for the unexpired term. The petition shall be sworn to by the candidate and by not less than two (2) registered voters from the district or circuit from which he or she seeks nomination, before an officer authorized to administer an oath. Signatures for nomination papers shall not be affixed on the document to be filed prior to the first Wednesday after the first Monday in November of the year preceding the year in which the office will appear on the ballot. The petition shall be filed no later than 4 p.m. local time at the place of filing when filed on the last date on which the papers are permitted to be filed.

The petition for nomination shall be in the form prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The petition shall include a declaration sworn to by the candidate, that he or she possesses all the constitutional and statutory requirements of the office for which the candidate has filed. Titles, ranks, or spurious phrases shall not be accepted on the petition and shall not be printed on the ballots as part of the candidate’s name; however, nicknames, initials, and contractions of given names may be acceptable as the candidate’s name.

The Secretary of State shall examine the petition of each candidate to determine whether it is regular on its face. If there is an error, the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate by certified mail within twenty-four (24) hours of filing.

The order of names on the ballot for each district or circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the first Tuesday after the first Monday in June preceding the regular election for those petitions for nomination required to be filed no later than the first Tuesday following the first Monday in June. For those petitions for nomination required to be filed no later than the second Tuesday in August, the order of names on the ballot for each district and circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, shall be determined by lot at a public drawing to be held in the office of the Secretary of State at 2 p.m., standard time, on the Thursday following the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular election.

Not later than the date set forth in KRS

118.215

and after the order of names on the ballot has been determined as required in subsection (6) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:

Certify to the county clerks of the respective counties entitled to participate in the election of the various candidates, the name and place of residence of each candidate for each office, by district or circuit, and numbered division if divisions exist, as specified in the petitions for nomination filed with the Secretary of State; and

Designate for the county clerks the office of the Court of Justice with which the names of candidates shall be printed and the order in which they are to appear on the ballot.

The ballot position of a candidate shall not be changed after the ballot position has been designated by the county clerk.

The county clerks of each county shall cause to be printed on the ballots, including absentee ballots, for the regular election the names of the candidates for offices of the Court of Justice.

The names of the candidates shall be placed on the ballots in a separate column or columns or in a separate line or lines and identified by the words “Judicial Ballot,” and in a manner so that the casting of a vote for all of the candidates of a political party will not operate to cast a vote for judicial candidates. The words “Vote for one” or “Vote for one in each division,” shall be printed on the appropriate location. The office, numbered division if divisions exist, and the candidates therefor shall be clearly labeled. No party designation or emblem of any kind, nor any sign indicating any candidate’s political belief or party affiliation, shall be used on any ballot.

The candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast at the regular election for a district or circuit, or for a numbered division if divisions exist, shall be elected.

A judge who elected to retire as a Senior Status Special Judge in accordance with KRS

21.580

shall not become a candidate or a nominee for any elected office during the five (5) year term prescribed in KRS

21.580

(1)(a)1., regardless of the number of days served by the judge acting as a Senior Status Special Judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 10, effective March 10, 1976; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 13; 1982, ch. 394, § 34, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 449, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 185, § 27, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 185, § 4, effective January 1, 1987; 1986, ch. 470, § 39, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 62, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 296, § 20, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 195, § 20, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 2, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 123, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 66, § 8, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 162, § 6, effective November 7, 2018; 2019 ch. 187, § 12, effective November 6, 2019; 2021 ch. 197, § 60, effective June 29, 2021.

118A.105.
Filling
vacancy where only one nominee in race. [Repealed.]

118A.110.
Initial
election of judges to Court of Appeals. [Repealed.]

118A.120.
Publication
and posting of names of certified candidates. [Repealed.]

118A.130.
Candidate’s name to appear but once.

No judicial candidate’s name shall appear on any ballot more than once.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 13, effective March 10, 1976; 1992, ch. 296, § 21, effective July 14, 1992; 2021 ch. 197, § 62, effective June 29, 2021.

118A.140.
Register
of candidates — Display of information on Web site.

The Secretary of State shall keep a book entitled “Register of Candidates for Nomination to Offices of the Court of Justice.” The Secretary of State shall enter in that book the name and place of residence of each candidate for nomination to the office of justice or judge in the primary, the date of receipt of his or her nomination papers, and petitions for candidacy filed pursuant to KRS

118A.100

. The book shall be a public record.

The Secretary of State shall prominently display a candidate’s information derived from subsection (1) of this section on the Secretary of State’s official Web site within five (5) business days following the date of receiving a candidate’s nomination papers and petitions for candidacy of each candidate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 14, effective March 10, 1976; 2022 ch. 219, § 10, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/13/93). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1)(e),
the prior reference to KRS

118A.110

which appeared in subsection (2) of this
statute has been deleted because of the repeal of KRS

118A.110

by 1992 Ky. Acts ch. 454, sec. 2, effective July 14, 1992.

118A.150.
Certification of candidates — Ballots — Effect of death or withdrawal of candidate — Penalty.

In certification of candidates for judicial office, no reference shall be made to political affiliation.

The Secretary of State shall not knowingly certify to the county clerk of any county the name of any candidate who has not filed the required nomination or candidacy papers, nor knowingly fail to certify the name of any candidate who has filed the required nomination or candidacy papers.

No county clerk shall knowingly cause to be printed on any ballots or absentee ballots for any election, the name of a candidate for an office of the Court of Justice who has not been certified in the manner specified in this chapter.

If, before the time of certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot provided for in this chapter, any candidate whose petition or certificate of nomination or petition for candidacy has been filed, dies or notifies the Secretary of State in writing, signed and properly notarized, that he will not accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State shall not certify his name.

If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose petition or certificate of nomination or petition for candidacy has been filed, dies or notifies the Secretary of State in the manner described in subsection (4) of this section, that he will not accept the nomination or election, the Secretary of State shall immediately notify the appropriate county clerk, and the clerk shall ensure that notice is provided to the appropriate precincts as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

If after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall withdraw or die, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall tabulate or record the votes cast for the candidate; and, in a primary, if there are only one (1) or two (2) remaining candidates on the ballot for that office, following the withdrawal or death of the other candidate or candidates, neither the precinct election officers nor the county board of elections shall tabulate or record the votes for the remaining candidate or candidates, and the officer with whom the remaining candidate or candidates has filed his or her nomination papers shall immediately issue and file in his or her office a certificate of nomination for that remaining candidate or candidates and send a copy to the remaining candidate or candidates.

If, after the certification of candidates who will appear on the ballot, any candidate whose name appears on the ballot shall withdraw pursuant to KRS

118.212

or die, the county clerk shall provide notices to the precinct election officers who shall see that a notice is conspicuously displayed at the polling place advising voters of the change, and that votes for the candidate shall not be tabulated or recorded. If the county clerk learns of the death or withdrawal at least five (5) days prior to the election and provides the notices required by this subsection and the precinct officers fail to post the notices at the polling place, the officers shall be guilty of a violation, subject to a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 15, effective March 10, 1976; 1986, ch. 470, § 40, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 63, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 2, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 101, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2021 ch. 197, § 61, effective June 29, 2021.

118A.160.
Hours
for filing — Inspection.

All nomination or candidacy
papers filed under this chapter shall during normal business hours be subject
to inspection by any person.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 16, effective March 10, 1976.

118A.170.
Ballot
labels. [Repealed.]

118A.180.
Preservation
of petitions and certificates. [Repealed.]

118A.190.
Issuance
of certificates by State Board of Elections — Tie votes.

The State Board of Elections shall issue certificates of nomination or election for all primary and regular elections as provided in this section.

Following a primary or regular election, the board of elections of each county shall make out duplicate certificates of the total number of votes received by each candidate, by circuit or district, and numbered division thereof if divisions exist. The certificate of the total number of votes shall be certified to the Secretary of State’s Office not later than 12 noon, prevailing time, on the Friday following the primary or regular election. The clerk shall keep one (1) of the certificates in his or her office and, within three (3) days of their receipt from the board, shall forward the other certificate by mail to the Secretary of State who shall deliver it to the State Board of Elections.

The State Board of Elections shall meet to count and tabulate the votes received by the different candidates as certified to the Secretary of State no later than the third Monday after the primary or regular election. When the board certifies the results of a primary or regular election, the right to contest the election or primary shall not be impaired. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum and may act. The board shall prepare the certificates of nomination or election in the office of the board, from the returns made. The certificates shall be in writing and in duplicate, and shall be signed by the board members. The board shall forward the original certificate, by mail, to the nominated or elected candidate, unless he or she has failed to comply with KRS Chapter 121. The duplicate shall be retained in the office of the board.

Certificates of nomination for a judicial office shall be issued to the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes, except that if more than two (2) candidates are found to have received the highest and an equal number of votes for the same office or if two (2) or more candidates are found to have received the second highest and an equal number of votes for the same office, the election shall be determined by lot in the manner the board directs, in the presence of not less than three (3) other persons.

The certificate of election for a judicial office shall be issued to the candidate receiving the highest number of votes, except that if two (2) or more candidates are found to have received the highest and an equal number of votes for the same office, the election shall be determined by lot in the manner the board directs, in the presence of not less than three (3) other persons.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 19, effective March 10, 1976; 1978, ch. 318, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1986, ch. 470, § 41, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 123, § 10, effective July 15, 2010.